Maryland, session 2026, HB1140.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
3–2B–01.
(a) (1) [The] BEFORE THE 2030 GENERAL ELECTION, THE Baltimore
County Board of Education consists of:
[(1)] (I) Seven nonpartisan elected members;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1140*

HOUSE BILL 1140
[(2)] (II) Four appointed members; and
[(3)] (III) One student member.
(2) BEGINNING WITH THE 2030 GENERAL ELECTION, THE
BALTIMORE COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION CONSISTS OF:
(I) NINE NONPARTISAN ELECTED MEMBERS;
(II) TWO APPOINTED MEMBERS; AND
(III) ONE STUDENT MEMBER.
(b) (1) (I) BEFORE THE 2030 GENERAL ELECTION, THE ELECTED AND
APPOINTED MEMBERS OF THE COUNTY BOARD ARE ELECTED AND APPOINTED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS PARAGRAPH.
(II) Of the 11 elected and appointed members of the county board:
[(i)] 1. One member shall be elected from each of the seven
councilmanic districts in the county, established by the County Council of Baltimore
County, by the voters of that district; and
[(ii)] 2. Four members shall be appointed by the Governor from
the county at large.
[(2) (i)] (III) 1. The seven elected members shall be elected at a
general election in gubernatorial election years in accordance with § 3–2B–02 of this
subtitle.
[(ii)] 2. The four appointed members shall be appointed by the
Governor in presidential election years from a list of nominees submitted by the Baltimore
County School Board Nominating Commission as provided in § 3–2B–03 of this subtitle:
[1.] A. On the expiration of the term of an incumbent
appointed member within 30 days after the general election; or
[2.] B. Within the 30–day period otherwise required under
this subtitle.
(2) (I) BEGINNING WITH THE 2030 GENERAL ELECTION, THE
ELECTED AND APPOINTED MEMBERS OF THE COUNTY BOARD ARE ELECTED AND
APPOINTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS PARAGRAPH.

HOUSE BILL 1140 3
(II) OF THE 11 ELECTED AND APPOINTED MEMBERS OF THE
COUNTY BOARD:
1. ONE MEMBER SHALL BE ELECTED FROM EACH OF THE
NINE COUNCILMANIC DISTRICTS IN THE COUNTY BY THE VOTERS OF THAT DISTRICT;
AND
2. TWO MEMBERS SHALL BE APPOINTED BY THE
GOVERNOR FROM THE COUNTY AT LARGE.
(III) 1. THE NINE ELECTED MEMBERS SHALL BE ELECTED AT
A GENERAL ELECTION IN GUBERNATORIAL ELECTION YEARS IN ACCORDANCE WITH
§ 3–2B–02 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
2. THE TWO APPOINTED MEMBERS SHALL BE
APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR IN PRESIDENTIAL ELECTION YEARS FROM A LIST OF
NOMINEES SUBMITTED BY THE BALTIMORE COUNTY SCHOOL BOARD NOMINATING
COMMISSION AS PROVIDED IN § 3–2B–03 OF THIS SUBTITLE:
A. ON THE EXPIRATION OF THE TERM OF AN INCUMBENT
APPOINTED MEMBER WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE GENERAL ELECTION; OR
B. WITHIN THE 30–DAY PERIOD OTHERWISE REQUIRED
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(3) (i) A member from a [school board] COUNCILMANIC district shall
be at least 21 years old, a resident of that district for at least 2 years, and a registered voter
of the county before the election.
(ii) A member from a district who does not maintain residency in
that district may not continue as a member of the county board and the office shall be
deemed vacant.
(iii) If the boundary line of a district is changed, the term of an
incumbent member of the county board who no longer resides in the district because of the
change is not affected during this term.
(4) (i) A member may not be elected or appointed to serve on the county
board for more than three consecutive terms.
(ii) A member who has served three consecutive 4–year terms may
not be elected or appointed to the county board until at least 4 years have elapsed since the
end of the member’s last term on the county board.
(5) During an election year:

HOUSE BILL 1140
(i) The Governor may not appoint as a member of the county board
an individual who files a certificate of candidacy for election to the county board; and
(ii) An individual who files a certificate of candidacy for election to
the county board may not seek appointment to the county board by the Governor through
nomination by the Baltimore County School Board Nominating Commission.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That of the four members
appointed to the Baltimore County Board of Education in 2028:
(1) The terms of two members shall terminate in 2030; and
(2) The terms of two members shall terminate in 2032.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.